Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 1. Assistant Judges

§ 131.
Powers and duties.

The assistant judges shall have the care and superintendence of county property, may provide for the acceptance and processing of U.S. passport applications by county clerks pursuant to memorandums of understanding entered into under

4 V.S.A. § 691

, may take deeds and leases of real estate to the county, rent or sell and convey unused lands belonging to the county, keep the courthouse, jail, and other county buildings insured, and make needed repairs and improvements in and around the same.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 167;

2011, No. 1

, § 10, eff. Feb. 2, 2011.

§ 132.
United States and State flags; display.

Such judges shall purchase at the expense of the county and cause to be displayed in the court room in the county courthouse a United States and a State flag.
On legal holidays commemorative of historic events they shall cause such flags to be displayed on the courthouse or grounds.

§ 133.
County tax; amount; assessment.

Annually, the assistant judges shall prepare a proposed budget of the county for the ensuing year.

Before a budget to be proposed at the annual meeting is finalized, the assistant judges shall hold a meeting to invite discussion of the preliminary proposed budget. The meeting to review the preliminary proposed budget shall take place at least 30 and not more than 40 days prior to the annual meeting. Notice of this meeting shall be published in all daily newspapers having general circulation in the county at least 14 days before the meeting. If a daily newspaper of general circulation is not published in the county, the notice shall be published in a weekly newspaper of general circulation in the county. A copy of the notice shall be mailed to the legislative bodies of the towns located in the county.

Annually, on or before January 31, the assistant judges shall call a meeting of the voters of the county for the purpose of presenting the proposed budget of the county for the ensuing year and inviting discussion thereon. The meeting shall be held at a place within the county and shall be warned by a notice posted in three public places in the county and published in all daily newspapers having general circulation in the county at least 30 and not more than 40 days prior to the meeting. If a daily newspaper of general circulation is not published in the county, the notice shall be published in a weekly newspaper of general circulation in the county. The warning shall include a summary of the expenditures being proposed for the various areas covered by the proposed budget and shall provide the public with information about how a copy of the proposal may be obtained. Members of legislative bodies of each of the towns within the county shall be notified of the meeting by mail. Copies of the proposed budget shall be available to the public during normal business hours in the county courthouse and in the office of the clerks of the towns located in the county.

Annually, not less than 14 nor more than 21 days following the county meeting provided in subsection (c) of this section, the assistant judges shall review the proposed budget of the county in light of any discussion thereon at the county meeting and, if deemed expedient, make and deliver to the county treasurer a written order directing the treasurer to issue, on or before March 1 following, the statements required by

32 V.S.A. § 4965

, and warrants to the several treasurers of the towns for the collection of a tax sufficient to pay such indebtedness and estimated expense, but the whole amount of such tax shall not exceed in one year five cents on a dollar of the equalized grand list of such county.

The proposed budget shall contain any cost estimates and preliminary plans for capital construction in the county pursuant to subchapter 2 of chapter 3 of this title, estimates of the indebtedness of the county, estimates of the probable ordinary expenses of the county for the ensuing year, and any and all other expenses and obligations of the county.
(e) (1) The proposed budget shall contain any cost estimates and preliminary plans for capital construction in the county pursuant to subchapter 2 of chapter 3 of this title, estimates of the indebtedness of the county, estimates of the probable ordinary expenses of the county for the ensuing year, and any and all other expenses and obligations of the county.

The budget may contain provisions for additions to an operations reserve fund, and the accumulated total reserve fund shall not at any time exceed an amount equal to 15 percent of the current budget presented.

Pursuant to a capital program, as described in section 4430 of this title, the budget may also include a provision for a separate reserve fund for capital construction, reconstruction, remodeling, repairs, renovation, design, or redesign, which shall not at any time exceed an amount equal to 75 percent of the current budget presented. However, if capital construction, reconstruction, remodeling, repairs, renovation, design, or redesign is necessitated by an insured loss or damage to a county building, the separate reserve fund may also include the amount of insurance proceeds received as a result of the loss or damage.

All county budgets shall include the amounts currently budgeted for each item included in the proposed budget.

The amount of the tax shall be apportioned upon the towns, unorganized towns, and gores according to the ratio of the equalized grand list, as defined in

16 V.S.A. § 3441

, of the individual town, unorganized town, or gore to the total equalized grand list of all the towns, unorganized towns, and gores in the county.

The assistant judges shall hold the meetings required by this section at times convenient to the public.

The fiscal year of the county shall end on January 31, unless the assistant judges, after discussion of the issue at the annual meeting, vote to have a different fiscal year, in which case the fiscal year so voted shall remain in effect until amended.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 20, 1968;

1971, No. 73

, § 3, eff. April 16,

1971, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

1983, No. 78

, eff. April 28, 1983;

1997, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1999;

2003, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. June 8, 2004;

2011, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 15, 2012;

2019, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 134.
County tax; county treasurer; warrant.

The county treasurer shall issue warrants on or before March 1 requiring the tax to be paid in two equal installments on or before July 5 and on or before November 5.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), eff. May 12, 1990;

2011, No. 81

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 13, 2012;

2017, No. 74

, § 62.

§ 135.
County tax; payment by town.

Each town treasurer shall present such warrant to the selectboard which, within the time required by the warrant, shall draw an order on the town treasury for the amount of such tax and such treasurer shall forthwith pay the county treasurer the amount of such order.
Such tax shall be assessed by the selectboard upon the grand list of the town unless otherwise provided for.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 74

, § 63.

§ 136.
Actions by and against county; process; attorney.

Actions in which a county is the party in interest shall be brought by or against the county, and service of process against a county shall be made by leaving copies with the county clerk or county treasurer.
The assistant judges may appoint an attorney to prosecute or defend actions in which the county is a party.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 198, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 137.
Jurisdiction.

Superior Courts, within their respective jurisdictions, may take cognizance of actions in favor of or against the county.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1973, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 77, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 168.

§ 138.
Local option taxes.

Local option taxes are authorized under this section for the purpose of affording municipalities an alternative method of raising municipal revenues to facilitate the transition and reduce the dislocations in those municipalities that may be caused by reforms to the method of financing public education under the Equal Educational Opportunity Act of 1997. Accordingly:

the local option taxes authorized under this section may be imposed by a municipality;

a municipality opting to impose a local option tax may do so prior to July 1, 1998 to be effective beginning January 1, 1999, and anytime after December 1, 1998 a local option tax shall be effective beginning on the next tax quarter following 90 days’ notice to the Department of Taxes of the imposition; and

a local option tax may only be adopted by a municipality in which:

the education property tax rate in 1997 was less than $1.10 per $100.00 of equalized education property value; or

the equalized grand list value of personal property, business machinery, inventory, and equipment is at least ten percent of the equalized education grand list as reported in the 1998 Annual Report of the Division of Property Valuation and Review; or

the combined education tax rate of the municipality will increase by 20 percent or more in fiscal year 1999 or in fiscal year 2000 over the rate of the combined education property tax in the previous fiscal year.

If the legislative body of a municipality by a majority vote recommends, the voters of a municipality may, at an annual or special meeting warned for that purpose, by a majority vote of those present and voting, assess any or all of the following:

a one percent sales tax;

a one percent meals and alcoholic beverages tax;

a one percent rooms tax.

Any tax imposed under the authority of this section shall be collected and administered by the Department of Taxes, in accordance with State law governing such State tax or taxes; provided, however, that a sales tax imposed under this section shall be collected on each sale that is subject to the Vermont sales tax using a destination basis for taxation. Except with respect to taxes collected on the sale of aviation jet fuel, a per-return fee of $5.96 shall be assessed to compensate the Department for the costs of administration and collection, 70 percent of which shall be borne by the municipality, and 30 percent of which shall be borne by the State to be paid from the PILOT Special Fund. The fee shall be subject to the provisions of

32 V.S.A. § 605

.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section and subdivision (2) of this subsection with respect to taxes collected on the sale of aviation jet fuel, of the taxes collected under this section, 70 percent of the taxes shall be paid on a quarterly basis to the municipality in which they were collected, after reduction for the costs of administration and collection under subsection (c) of this section. Revenues received by a municipality may be expended for municipal services only, and not for education expenditures. Any remaining revenue shall be deposited into the PILOT Special Fund established by

32 V.S.A. § 3709

.
(d) (1) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section and subdivision (2) of this subsection with respect to taxes collected on the sale of aviation jet fuel, of the taxes collected under this section, 70 percent of the taxes shall be paid on a quarterly basis to the municipality in which they were collected, after reduction for the costs of administration and collection under subsection (c) of this section. Revenues received by a municipality may be expended for municipal services only, and not for education expenditures. Any remaining revenue shall be deposited into the PILOT Special Fund established by

32 V.S.A. § 3709

.

Of the taxes collected under this section on the sale of aviation jet fuel, on a quarterly basis, 70 percent of the taxes shall be paid to the municipality in which they were collected, and 30 percent shall be deposited in the Transportation Fund.
(2) (A) Of the taxes collected under this section on the sale of aviation jet fuel, on a quarterly basis, 70 percent of the taxes shall be paid to the municipality in which they were collected, and 30 percent shall be deposited in the Transportation Fund.

All revenues referenced in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) shall be used exclusively for aviation purposes consistent with 49 U.S.C. § 47133 and Federal Aviation Administration regulations and policies.

As used in this section, “municipality” means a city, town, or incorporated village.

Nothing in this section shall affect the validity of any existing provision of law or municipal charter authorizing a municipality to impose a tax similar to the local option taxes authorized in this section.

If the legislative body of a municipality by a majority vote recommends or by petition of ten percent of the voters of a municipality recommends, the voters of a municipality may at an annual or special meeting warned for that purpose by a majority vote of those present and voting rescind any or all of the local option taxes assessed under subsection (b) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 60

, § 88; amended

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 61, eff. March 11, 1998;

1999, No. 49

, § 87, eff. June 2, 1999;

2001, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2003, No. 66

, § 53b, see effective date note set out below;

2003, No. 68

, §§ 66, 68, eff. June 18, 2003;

2003, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2005, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 286, 293b, 293c;

2009, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2011, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 37;

2011, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. May 15, 2012;

2017, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 36, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 139.
Assistant judge judicial education.

The assistant judges, either collectively or through a duly authorized committee of assistant judges established by a majority vote of the assistant judges after consultation with the administrative judge, shall, by majority vote:

identify the training needs of assistant judges, including needs which are required by law; and

design, organize, and implement training for assistant judges, including training which is required by law.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 70

, § 3, eff. June 16, 2001.